Hawaii statutes.
[CHAPTER
572C]

RECIPROCAL
BENEFICIARIES

Section

572C-1 Purpose

572C-2 Findings

572C-3 Definitions

572C-4 Requisites of a valid reciprocal
beneficiary

relationship

572C-5 Registration as reciprocal beneficiaries;
filing fees;

records

572C-6 Rights and obligations

572C-7 Termination of reciprocal beneficiary
relationship;

filing fees and records; termination upon
marriage

Note

L 2012, c 267, §§16 and 17 provide:

"SECTION 16. [Section
retroactive to October 3, 2011. L 2012, c 267, §20(1).] If two
individuals terminated a reciprocal beneficiary relationship on or after
October 3, 2011, but before the date this Act became law upon its approval [Act
effective retroactive to January 1, 2012, and approved July 6, 2012], and
the two individuals subsequently enter or entered into a civil union no later
than ninety days after their reciprocal beneficiary relationship terminated,
their reciprocal beneficiary relationship shall be deemed to continue
uninterrupted until the civil union is or was solemnized. The couple shall
suffer no loss or interruption of any rights, benefits, protections, or
obligations derived from their reciprocal beneficiary relationship, and those
rights, benefits, protections, or obligations shall be deemed to have accrued
as of the first date they existed under the beneficiary relationship, if they
meet the requirements of this section.

For purposes of this section, holding title to property as
tenants by the entirety shall be included among the rights of a reciprocal
beneficiary relationship that shall continue uninterrupted under this section;
provided that no intervening liens were perfected and attached on the property
after the reciprocal beneficiary relationship was terminated, and before the
date this Act became law upon its approval [Act effective retroactive to
January 1, 2012, and approved July 6, 2012].

SECTION 17. Notwithstanding subsection 572C-7(c), Hawaii
Revised Statutes, if before the effective date of this section [retroactive
to January 1, 2012], two individuals entered into a valid legal union in
another jurisdiction that is not a marriage recognized under chapter 572,
Hawaii Revised Statutes, and is substantially equivalent to a civil union under
chapter 572B, Hawaii Revised Statutes, and are also parties to a reciprocal
beneficiary relationship in this State, the reciprocal beneficiary relationship
shall terminate and their valid legal union entered into in another
jurisdiction shall be recognized as a civil union under section 572B-10, Hawaii
Revised Statutes, on the voluntary termination of the reciprocal beneficiary
relationship under subsection 572C-7(a), Hawaii Revised Statutes, but no later
than one year after the date this Act becomes law upon its approval [Act
effective retroactive to January 1, 2012, and approved July 6, 2012]."

Civil union or reciprocal beneficiary relationship in
existence before December 2, 2013 not invalidated by L Sp 2013 2d, c 1. L Sp
2013, c 1, §11.

Cross References

Continuity of rights; civil union and reciprocal beneficiary
relationships, see §572-1.7.

Law Journals and Reviews

Hawaii's Loss of Consortium Doctrine: Our Substantive,
Relational Interest Focus. VII HBJ No. 13, at pg. 59.

The Hawai‘i Marriage Amendment: Its Origins, Meaning and
Fate. 22 UH L. Rev. 19.

The Recognition of Same-Sex Relationships: Comparative
Institutional Analysis, Contested Social Goals, and Strategic Institutional
Choice. 28 UH L. Rev. 23 (2005).

Extending Loss of Consortium to Reciprocal Beneficiaries:
Breaking the Illogical Boundary Between Severe Injury and Death in Hawai‘i Tort
Law. 28 UH L. Rev. 429 (2006).

Tax Justice and Same-Sex Domestic Partner Health Benefits:
An Analysis of the Tax Equity For Health Plan Beneficiaries Act. 32 UH L. Rev.
73 (2009).

Baehr v. Lewin and the Long Road to Marriage Equality. 33 UH
L. Rev. 705 (2011).

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next